Florida, session 2026, HB1425.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
465.0125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
465.0125 Consultant pharmacist license; application,
renewal, fees; responsibilities; rules.—
(1) The department shall issue or renew a consultant
pharmacist license upon receipt of an initial or renewal
application that conforms to the requirements for consultant
pharmacist initial licensure or renewal as adopted by the board
by rule and a fee set by the board not to exceed $250. To be
licensed as a consultant pharmacist, a pharmacist must complete
additional training as required by the board.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1425-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1425 2026
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the term "health care
facility" means an ambulatory surgical center or hospital
licensed under chapter 395, an alcohol or chemical dependency
treatment center licensed under chapter 397, an inpatient
hospice licensed under part IV of chapter 400, a nursing home
licensed under part II of chapter 400, an ambulatory care center
as defined in s. 408.07, or a nursing home component under
chapter 400 within a continuing care facility licensed under
chapter 651 , or a health care clinic licensed under part X of
chapter 400 that is owned by a hospital or by one or more
physicians that are employed by a hospital.
Section 2. Paragraphs (e) through (x) of subsection (1) of
section 626.8825, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (f) through (y), respectively, and a new paragraph
(e) is added to that subsection, and paragraph (e) of subsection
(2) of that section is amended, to read:
626.8825 Pharmacy benefit manager transparency and
accountability.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(e) "Covered prescription drug" means any drug or biologic
included in the pharmacy benefit manager's formulary that is
paid as a pharmacy benefit at any of the pharmacy benefits plan
or program network pharmacies.
(2) CONTRACTS BETWEEN A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER AND A
PHARMACY BENEFITS PLAN OR PROGRAM.—In addition to any other
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1425-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1425 2026
requirements in the Florida Insurance Code, all contractual
arrangements executed, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after
July 1, 2023, which are applicable to pharmacy benefits covered
on or after January 1, 2024, between a pharmacy benefit manager
and a pharmacy benefits plan or program must include, in
substantial form, terms that ensure compliance with all of the
following requirements and that, except to the extent not
allowed by law, shall supersede any contractual terms to the
contrary:
(e) Include network adequacy requirements that meet or
exceed Medicare Part D program standards for convenient access
to the network pharmacies set forth in 42 C.F.R. s.
423.120(a)(1) and that:
1. Do not limit a network to solely include affiliated
pharmacies;
2. Require a pharmacy benefit manager to offer a provider
contract to licensed pharmacies physically located on the
physical site of providers that are:
a. Within the pharmacy benefits plan's or program's
geographic service area and that have been specifically
designated as essential providers by the Agency for Health Care
Administration pursuant to s. 409.975(1)(a);
b. Designated as cancer centers of excellence under s.
381.925, regardless of the pharmacy benefits plan's or program's
geographic service area;
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1425-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1425 2026
c. Organ transplant hospitals, regardless of the pharmacy
benefits plan's or program's geographic service area;
d. Hospitals licensed as specialty children's hospitals as
defined in s. 395.002; or
e. Regional perinatal intensive care centers as defined in
s. 383.16(2), regardless of the pharmacy benefits plan's or
program's geographic service area.

Such provider contracts must be solely for the administration
and or dispensing of covered prescription drugs, including
biological products, which are administered through infusions,
intravenously injected, or inhaled during a surgical procedure
or are covered parenteral drugs, as part of onsite outpatient
care;
3. Do not require a covered person to receive a
prescription drug by United States mail, common carrier, local
courier, third-party company or delivery service, or pharmacy
direct delivery unless the prescription drug cannot be acquired
at any retail pharmacy in the pharmacy benefit manager's network
for the covered person's pharmacy benefits plan or program. This
subparagraph does not prohibit a pharmacy benefit manager from
operating mail order or delivery programs on an opt-in basis at
the sole discretion of a covered person, provided that the
covered person is not penalized through the imposition of any
100 additional retail cost-sharing obligations or a lower allowed-
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1425-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1425 2026
101 quantity limit for choosing not to select the mail order or
102 delivery programs;
103 4. For the in-person administration of covered
104 prescription drugs, prohibit requiring a covered person to
105 receive pharmacist services from an affiliated pharmacy or an
106 affiliated health care provider; and
107 5. Prohibit offering or implementing pharmacy networks
108 that require or provide a promotional item or an incentive,
109 defined as anything other than a reduced cost-sharing amount or
110 enhanced quantity limit allowed under the benefit design for a
111 covered drug, to a covered person to use an affiliated pharmacy
112 or an affiliated health care provider for the in-person
113 administration of covered prescription drugs; or advertising,
114 marketing, or promoting an affiliated pharmacy to covered
115 persons. Subject to the foregoing, a pharmacy benefit manager
116 may include an affiliated pharmacy in communications to covered
117 persons regarding network pharmacies and prices, provided that
118 the pharmacy benefit manager includes information, such as links
119 to all nonaffiliated network pharmacies, in such communications
120 and that the information provided is accurate and of equal
121 prominence. This subparagraph may not be construed to prohibit a
122 pharmacy benefit manager from entering into an agreement with an
123 affiliated pharmacy to provide pharmacist services to covered
124 persons.
125 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1425-00